Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 4. Saratoga Hot Springs State Reserve

§ 36-8-401.
Purchase of hot springs; description of land.

The state board of charities and reform of the state of Wyoming is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to purchase, take and secure the title thereof in the name of the state of Wyoming and pay therefor, in the manner hereinafter provided, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) for the lands within which the Saratoga Hot Springs are situated and located, which said lands are described as follows, to-wit: the northwest one-fourth; the north one-half of the southwest one-fourth, and the southwest one-fourth of the southwest one-fourth of section 13; the east one-half of the southwest one-fourth of section 12 and all that portion of the west one-half of the southwest one-fourth of section 12 not included in Caldwell Hot Springs addition to the town of Saratoga, Carbon county, state of Wyoming; and all of the unsold lots in said addition to-wit: lots 2 to 11, both inclusive, of block 2; blocks 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8; lots 6, 8, 9 and 10 in block 9; lots 1, 3, 4, 5, and 6 in block 14; lots 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8 in block 15; (being 108 lots) all in township 17 north, range 84 west of the sixth principal meridian and in said Carbon county, and subject only to the right-of-way heretofore granted to the Saratoga & Encampment Railway Company, together with all the hot medicinal and mineral springs therein contained and all improvements thereon; which said property is commonly known as the Saratoga Hot Springs and contains four hundred twenty (420) acres more or less.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 162, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 108-1601; C.S. 1945, § 19-801; W.S. 1957, § 36-173.

§ 36-8-402.
Control and use of property; transfer of control to the Wyoming department of state parks and cultural resources.

The property described in W.S.

36-8-401

is placed under control of the state board of charities and reform or its successors and forever set aside for the treatment and care of diseases and for sanitary, charitable and such other purposes as determined by the board or its successors.

As provided by W.S.

36-4-122

, the department of state parks and cultural resources is designated as successor to the state board of charities and reform, Wyoming recreation commission and the department of commerce under this article effective July 1, 1999.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 162, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 108-1602; C.S. 1945, § 19-802; W.S. 1957, § 36-174; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

§ 36-8-403.
Sale of lands and improvements; authority.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions contained in W.S.

36-8-401

,

36-8-402

, or in any other provision of law, the sale of the lands and improvements known as and included in the Saratoga Hot Springs Reserve to any person, association of persons, firm or corporation, without restriction as to use or occupancy, is hereby authorized.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 98, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-175; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

The 2007 amendment

deleted “36-8-406 and 36-8-407,” preceding “or in any other provision.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 36-8-404.
Sale of lands and improvements; conduct of sale.

Any sale of the lands and improvements referred to in W.S.

36-8-403

shall be conducted by the state board of land commissioners in the manner provided for the sale of other state lands in W.S.

36-9-101

,

36-9-102

and

36-9-104

through

36-9-120

, provided, however, that the board shall appoint three (3) qualified disinterested appraisers, not members of the board, to make an appraisal of the said properties, not more than ninety (90) days prior to the call for bids. Any sale so negotiated shall be for cash, and transfer of title shall be by quitclaim deed executed according to the rules of the state board of land commissioners.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 98, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-176.

§ 36-8-405.
Lease of lands and improvements.

The department, in consultation with the commission, may lease the lands and improvements referred to in W.S.

36-8-403

to any person, association, firm or corporation for any lawful purpose, for any term not in excess of ninety-nine (99) years.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 98, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 36-177; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2.

Meaning of “commission.” —

See note under same catchline at §

36-8-304

.

Meaning of “department.” —

The word “department,” referred to in this section, apparently means the department of state parks and cultural resources.

§§ 36-8-406 and 36-8-407.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 162, § 5; and Laws 1925, ch. 10, § 2; related to the depositing and crediting of monies, and the superintendent of lands.